Illinois, session 104th, HB5176.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Family 5Law Definitions Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 7finds that certain terms are used commonly in many family 8court proceedings that do not have clear and consistent 9meanings. These terms have significant implications for both 10parents and children and should not be used casually. 11Establishing consistent definitions for these terms will 12enhance the ability of the family law system to reach outcomes 13that best support the safety, health, and best interests of 14all parties. 15    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:16    (a) A parent shall be designated as a "safe parent" if and 17only if the parent:18        (1) does not neglect or abuse the child;19        (2) does not abuse the other parent;20        (3) has not previously neglected or abused the child 21    or the other parent, absent a positive assessment, on the 22    record, by a qualified physician who has been the abuser's   HB5176- 2 -LRB104 20262 JRC 33713 b1    primary behavioral health provider for at least one year, 2    based on specific and articulable facts, that all of the 3    following are true: 4            (A) the abuse was the result of a behavioral 5        health disorder or psychological or neurological 6        condition;7            (B) the abuser has successfully completed 8        treatment or is satisfactorily complying with ongoing 9        or indefinite treatment, with at least a 12-month 10        unbroken history of such compliance; and11            (C) the abuse is unlikely to continue or to recur;12        (4) is judged by court-appointed officers, acting as 13    required by this Act, to be capable of safely interacting 14    with and caring for the child without supervision;15        (5) is not the respondent to any order of protection, 16    presently in effect, which is sustained after a hearing; 17    and18        (6) is not under the care of a mental health provider 19    for a serious behavioral, psychological, or emotional 20    condition that the court, in consultation with the 21    diagnosing provider, deems to pose a potential risk to the 22    child.23    (b) An act or statement shall be deemed "parental 24alienation" if and only if: 25        (1) all of the following criteria are met: 26            (i) it has the purpose or effect of seeking,   HB5176- 3 -LRB104 20262 JRC 33713 b1        without good cause, to separate, estrange, or 2        emotionally distance the child from a safe parent;3            (ii) it has the purpose or effect of influencing 4        the child in such a way that the child's opinion of a 5        safe parent is diminished or shaped in bad faith and is 6        defamatory or libelous, factually selective or 7        obfuscating, or age-inappropriate;8            (iii) it is not reasonably related to and a 9        plausibly necessary part of good faith efforts by a 10        safe parent to preserve or achieve the safety and 11        mental and emotional health of the child;12        (2) if the act or statement is directed at or concerns 13    a parent who is not a safe parent, that parent does not 14    demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the act 15    or statement was unnecessary and unrelated to the safety 16    or welfare of the child; 17        (3) if a statement, it was objectively false or 18    misleading or was made with reckless disregard for the 19    truth.20    (c) A parent's behavior shall be deemed "high conflict" if 21and only if all of the following criteria are met, based on 22specific and articulable facts within the context:23        (1) it is obstreperous, combative, petty, or 24    injudicious;25        (2) it constitutes arbitrary opposition to the other 26    parent's time with or access to the child when such   HB5176- 4 -LRB104 20262 JRC 33713 b1    conduct is not reasonably justified by facts or safety 2    concerns; 3        (3) it is not the behavior of a safe parent; and4        (4) it is not a reaction arising from abuse trauma, 5    fear of or negative reaction to a current or former 6    abuser, distress, PTSD, depression, or anxiety.7    If abuse or continued risk of abuse by the other parent of 8the parent in question is indicated by a preponderance of the 9evidence, the abuser has not rebutted, by clear and convincing 10evidence, a default presumption that criteria (1) through (4) 11of this subsection (c) are not met. 12    Section 15. Required terms. 13    (a) The definitions established in this Act must be used 14and applied as applicable in all family law proceedings in 15this State. 16    (b) No alternative similar terms may be used or invented 17if their use or interpretation has the purpose or effect of 18evading compliance with these definitions. 19    (c) Failure by a court to apply these definitions, if 20applicable, constitutes reversible legal error and gives rise 21to a cause for appeal.